Florida, session 2026, SB442.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSubsection (6) is added to section 933.02, 28 Florida Statutes, to read: 29 933.02âGrounds for issuance of search warrant.âUpon proper 30 affidavits being made, a search warrant may be issued under the 31 provisions of this chapter upon any of the following grounds: 32 (6)âTo recover a deceased body. 33 34 This section also applies to any papers or documents used as a 35 means of or in aid of the commission of any offense against the 36 laws of the state. 37 Section 2.âSection 933.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to 38 read: 39 933.05âIssuance and return of search warrants; issuance in 40 blank prohibited.â 41 (1)âA search warrant cannot be issued except upon probable 42 cause supported by affidavit or affidavits, naming or describing 43 the person, place, or thing to be searched and particularly 44 describing the property or thing to be seized. A; no search 45 warrant may not shall be issued in blank. 46 (2)âA search, and any such warrant must shall be returned 47 within 10 days after issuance, not including the date of 48 issuance thereof, except that a search warrant issued: 49 (a)âTo an out-of-state provider for electronic 50 communications data as described in s. 934.23 must be returned 51 within 20 days. 52 (b)âTo search for and seize specimens from a specific 53 person for DNA analysis and comparison, including blood and 54 saliva samples, or to seize specimens pursuant to s. 943.325 for 55 entry into the DNA database must be returned within 30 days. 56 (c)âFor a computer, a computer system, or an electronic 57 device must be returned within 365 days, as those terms are 58 defined in s. 815.03, that is in the actual possession of a law 59 enforcement agency at the time such warrant is issued shall be 60 returned to the court within 45 days after issuance thereof. 61 (3)âIf a search warrant is issued to search for and seize 62 data or information contained in a computer, computer system, or 63 electronic device, such warrant is considered timely executed if 64 the computer, computer system, or electronic device was seized 65 by a law enforcement agency within 10 days of the issuance of 66 the search warrant, not including the date of issuance. 67 (4)âThis section does not require a law enforcement agency 68 to complete the analysis or review of data or information 69 contained in a computer, computer system, or electronic device 70 within the period provided in subsection (2) if such computer, 71 computer system, or electronic device was timely seized by a law 72 enforcement agency under subsection (3). 73 (5)âFor purposes of this section, the terms âcomputer,â 74 âcomputer system,â and âelectronic deviceâ have the same meaning 75 as in s. 815.03. 76 Section 3.âSubsection (5) is added to section 933.07, 77 Florida Statutes, and subsection (1) of that section is 78 republished, to read: 79 933.07âIssuance of search warrants.â 80 (1)âThe judge, upon examination of the application and 81 proofs submitted, if satisfied that probable cause exists for 82 the issuing of the search warrant, shall thereupon issue a 83 search warrant signed by him or her with his or her name of 84 office, to any sheriff and the sheriffâs deputies or any police 85 officer or other person authorized by law to execute process, 86 commanding the officer or person forthwith to search the 87 property described in the warrant or the person named, for the 88 property specified, and to bring the property and any person 89 arrested in connection therewith before the judge or some other 90 court having jurisdiction of the offense. 91 (5)âA judge may authorize a law enforcement officer 92 applying for a search warrant under subsection (1) to appear 93 remotely using audio-video communication technology. As used in 94 this section, the term âaudio-video communication technologyâ 95 has the same meaning as in s. 117.201. 96 Section 4.âSection 934.025, Florida Statutes, is created to 97 read: 98 934.025âSearch warrants and court orders; remote appearance 99 authorized.âA judge may authorize a law enforcement officer 100 applying for a search warrant or court order pursuant to this 101 chapter to appear remotely using audio-video communication 102 technology. As used in this section, the term âaudio-video 103 communication technologyâ has the same meaning as in s. 117.201. 104 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 105 934.50, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 106 934.50âSearches and seizure using a drone.â 107 (4)âEXCEPTIONS.âThis section does not prohibit the use of a 108 drone: 109 (b)âIf the law enforcement agency first obtains a search 110 warrant signed by a judge authorizing the use of a drone, 111 including, but not limited to, a search warrant authorizing a 112 law enforcement agency to search an area or areas where evidence 113 that a crime was committed might reasonably be found. 114 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.